Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CHAMPLIN; ELM CREEK GREENWAY TRAIL CORRIDOR.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to the city of Champlin for property and easement acquisition and predesign for a new segment of the Elm Creek Greenway Trail Corridor in the city of Champlin to connect Mississippi Crossings to the Elm Creek Park Reserve. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end